Maryland, session 2026, SB0743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Workgroup to Study State Laws on Electric Bicycles.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of State Police, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the President of the Maryland Association of Counties, or the
President’s designee;
(6) the President of the Maryland Municipal League, or the President’s
designee; and
(7) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0743*

SENATE BILL 743
(i) one representative of a rural law enforcement agency;
(ii) one representative of a suburban law enforcement agency; and
(iii) one representative of an urban law enforcement agency.
(c) The Workgroup shall elect a chair from among its members.
(d) The Department of Transportation shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) review current State law regarding rules of the road for electric bicycles
and make recommendations for revisions to improve public safety and address safety
concerns identified during the study;
(2) review information from academic studies and data compiled by
governments on injury rates and general safety concerns of electric bicycle riders and, to
the extent they are impacted by the use of electric bicycles, other vehicle operators and
pedestrians; and
(3) consider the significance and role of other micro–mobility devices with
respect to public safety.
(g) On or before January 1, 2028, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 6 months and, at the end of
January 1, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect.